Utah statutes.
17-53-212.   Examination and audit of accounts.

(1)  A county legislative body may examine and audit the accounts of all officers having the care, management, collection, or disbursement of money belonging to the county or appropriated by law or otherwise for its use and benefit.

(2)  Nothing in this section may be construed to affect a county auditor's authority under Chapter 19a, County Auditor.



Amended by Chapter 17, 2012 General Session

